Hawaii statutes.
§431:15-318 Claims of holders of void or
voidable rights. (a) No claims of a creditor who has received or acquired
a preference, lien, conveyance, transfer, assignment, or encumbrance, voidable
under this article, shall be allowed unless the creditor surrenders the
preference, lien, conveyance, transfer, assignment or encumbrance. If the
avoidance is effected by a proceeding in which a final judgment has been
entered, the claim shall not be allowed unless the money is paid or the
property is delivered to the liquidator within thirty days from the date of the
entering of the final judgment, except that the court having jurisdiction over
the liquidation may allow further time if there is an appeal or other
continuation of the proceeding.

(b) A claim allowable under subsection (a) by
reason of the avoidance, whether voluntary or involuntary, of a preference,
lien, conveyance, transfer, assignment, or encumbrance, may be filed as an
excused late filing under section 431:15-325 if filed within thirty days from
the date of the avoidance, or within the further time allowed by the court
under subsection (a). [L 1987, c 347, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next